Idaho, session 2026, S1289.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 37, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-3717D, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-3717D. IDAHO PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION -- LIMITA-
TIONS ON SCHOLARSHIPS. (1) For the purposes of this section, "scholarship"
means any form of financial aid, tuition waiver, grant, or other financial
assistance, whether full or partial, awarded by an Idaho public institution
of higher education, including those offered entirely or partly on the basis
of a student's academic performance or record, athletic ability, or partici-
pation in athletics.
(2) All Idaho public institutions of higher education shall give pref-
erence to Idaho residents in awarding scholarships.
(3) For student athletes in a given academic year, Idaho public insti-
tutions of higher education shall not award a scholarship to more than ten
percent (10%) of the total number of student athletes for all sports rosters,
excluding football, to students who are not United States citizens. Foot-
ball rosters shall have no more than five percent (5%) of student athletes
receiving a scholarship who are not United States citizens at any given time.
No men's or women's collegiate athletic team at an Idaho public institution
of higher education shall have more than fifty percent (50%) of its student
members receiving a scholarship who are not United States citizens at any
given time.
(4) Scholarships awarded to students who are not United States citizens
who are enrolled in an Idaho public institution of higher education prior to
the effective date of this act shall not be invalidated by the provisions
of this section. Such students shall not be counted toward the ten percent
(10%) cap provided for in subsection (3) of this section for a period not to
exceed four (4) full-time, consecutive academic years including those al-
ready completed or in progress.
(5) The Idaho state board of education shall promulgate rules, subject
to legislative approval, to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.